District of Columbia statutes.
38-828.01

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-209, § 801, 57 DCR 4779